Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-4708
Caregiver; liability.

A caregiver is not liable for harm caused to a child who participates in an activity approved by the caregiver or by a child who participates in an activity approved by a caregiver if the caregiver has acted in accordance with the reasonable and prudent parent standard. This section may not be interpreted as removing or limiting any existing liability protection afforded by law.

Laws 2016, LB746, § 8.